Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Part 3

Statewide Voter Registration Database

2-2-301. Purpose.

The purpose of this part is to establish a statewide voter registration database maintained by the state coordinator of elections to comply with the Help America Vote Act.

Acts 2005, ch. 308, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The Help America Vote Act of 2002, referred to in this section, is compiled generally in 42 U.S.C. §§ 15301 et seq.

2-2-302. Automated Electoral System (AES) designated as official list of registered voters.

As of January 1, 2006, the Automated Electoral System (AES) shall be the official list of registered voters in the state.

Acts 2005, ch. 308, § 1.

Law Reviews.

When Names Disappear: State Roll-Maintenance Practices, 49 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1107 (Summer 2019).

2-2-303. Transfer of data from county election commission offices to the state coordinator of elections.

Data from county election commission offices shall be transferred to the state coordinator of elections via the Automated Electoral System (AES) not less than once daily.

Acts 2005, ch. 308, § 1.